Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-445
Settlement of accounts and contributions among partners.

(1) In winding up a partnership's business, the assets of the partnership, including the contributions of the partners required by this section, must be applied to discharge its obligations to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners who are creditors. Any surplus must be applied to pay in cash the net amount distributable to partners in accordance with their right to distributions under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Each partner is entitled to a settlement of all partnership accounts upon winding up the partnership business. In settling accounts among the partners, profits and losses that result from the liquidation of the partnership assets must be credited and charged to the partners' accounts. The partnership shall make a distribution to a partner in an amount equal to any excess of the credits over the charges in the partner's account. A partner shall contribute to the partnership an amount equal to any excess of the charges over the credits in the partner's account but excluding from the calculation charges attributable to an obligation for which the partner is not personally liable under section 67-418.

(3) If a partner fails to contribute the full amount required under subsection (2) of this section, all of the other partners shall contribute, in the proportions in which those partners share partnership losses, the additional amount necessary to satisfy the partnership obligations for which they are personally liable under section 67-418. A partner or partner's legal representative may recover from the other partners any contributions the partner makes to the extent the amount contributed exceeds that partner's share of the partnership obligations for which the partner is personally liable under section 67-418.

(4) After the settlement of accounts, each partner shall contribute, in the proportion in which the partner shares partnership losses, the amount necessary to satisfy partnership obligations that were not known at the time of the settlement and for which the partner is personally liable under section 67-418.

(5) The estate of a deceased partner is liable for the partner's obligation to contribute to the partnership.

(6) An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a partnership or a partner, may enforce a partner's obligation to contribute to the partnership.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 45.

In calculating a buyout distribution for dissociating partners, the hypothetical sale must be based on all of the partnership's assets and not just selected assets. Robertson v. Jacobs Cattle Co., 292 Neb. 195, 874 N.W.2d 1 (2015).

The capital gain which would be realized upon a hypothetical liquidation of the partnership’s land on the date of dissociation would constitute “profits” within the meaning of the phrase in subsection (2) of this section. Robertson v. Jacobs Cattle Co., 285 Neb. 859, 830 N.W.2d 191 (2013).